Illinois, session 104th, SB2002.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Sections 2605-375, 2605-585, 2605-590, 2605-595, and 2605-605 7as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-375)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)9    Sec. 2605-375. Missing persons; Law Enforcement Agencies 10Data System (LEADS).11    (a) To utilize the statewide Law Enforcement Agencies Data 12System (LEADS) for the purpose of providing electronic access 13by authorized entities to criminal justice data repositories 14and effecting an immediate law enforcement response to reports 15of missing persons, including lost, missing or runaway minors, 16lost or missing individuals with developmental or intellectual 17disabilities, and missing endangered seniors. The Illinois 18State Police shall implement an automatic data exchange system 19to compile, to maintain, and to make available to other law 20enforcement agencies for immediate dissemination data that can 21assist appropriate agencies in recovering missing persons and 22provide access by authorized entities to various data 23repositories available through LEADS for criminal justice and   SB2002 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1related purposes. To assist the Illinois State Police in this 2effort, funds may be appropriated from the State Police Law 3Enforcement Administration Fund LEADS Maintenance Fund. Funds 4may be appropriated from the State Police Law Enforcement 5Administration Fund LEADS Maintenance Fund to the Illinois 6State Police to finance any of its lawful purposes or 7functions in relation to defraying the expenses associated 8with establishing, maintaining, and supporting the issuance of 9electronic citations. 10    (b) In exercising its duties under this Section, the 11Illinois State Police shall provide a uniform reporting format 12(LEADS) for the entry of pertinent information regarding the 13report of a missing person into LEADS. The report must include 14all of the following: 15        (1) Relevant information obtained from the 16    notification concerning the missing person, including all 17    of the following:18            (A) a physical description of the missing person;19            (B) the date, time, and place that the missing 20        person was last seen; and21            (C) the missing person's address.22        (2) Information gathered by a preliminary 23    investigation, if one was made.24        (3) A statement by the law enforcement officer in 25    charge stating the officer's assessment of the case based 26    on the evidence and information received.  SB2002 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (b-5) The Illinois State Police shall:2        (1) Develop and implement a policy whereby a statewide 3    or regional alert would be used in situations relating to 4    the disappearances of individuals, based on criteria and 5    in a format established by the Illinois State Police. Such 6    a format shall include, but not be limited to, the age of 7    the missing person and the suspected circumstance of the 8    disappearance.9        (2) Notify all law enforcement agencies that reports 10    of missing persons shall be entered as soon as the minimum 11    level of data specified by the Illinois State Police is 12    available to the reporting agency and that no waiting 13    period for the entry of the data exists.14        (3) Compile and retain information regarding lost, 15    abducted, missing, or runaway minors in a separate data 16    file, in a manner that allows that information to be used 17    by law enforcement and other agencies deemed appropriate 18    by the Director, for investigative purposes. The 19    information shall include the disposition of all reported 20    lost, abducted, missing, or runaway minor cases.21        (4) Compile and maintain an historic data repository 22    relating to lost, abducted, missing, or runaway minors and 23    other missing persons, including, but not limited to, lost 24    or missing individuals with developmental or intellectual 25    disabilities and missing endangered seniors, in order to 26    develop and improve techniques utilized by law enforcement   SB2002 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    agencies when responding to reports of missing persons.2        (5) Create a quality control program regarding 3    confirmation of missing person data, timeliness of entries 4    of missing person reports into LEADS, and performance 5    audits of all entering agencies.6    (c) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 7shall conduct a training program for law enforcement personnel 8of local governmental agencies in the Missing Persons 9Identification Act. 10    (d) The Illinois State Police shall perform the duties 11prescribed in the Missing Persons Identification Act, subject 12to appropriation. 13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-585)15    Sec. 2605-585. Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. 16Moneys and the sale proceeds distributed to the Illinois State 17Police under paragraph (3) of Section 29B-26 of the Criminal 18Code of 2012 shall be deposited in a special fund in the State 19treasury to be known as the State Police Law Enforcement 20Administration Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. The 21moneys deposited in the State Police Law Enforcement 22Administration Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund shall be 23appropriated to and administered by the Illinois State Police 24for State law enforcement purposes. This Fund is dissolved 25upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Money   SB2002 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Laundering Asset Recovery Fund to the State Police Law 2Enforcement Administration Fund as provided under subsection 3(b) of Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. This Section is 4repealed on January 1, 2027. 5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-590)7    Sec. 2605-590. Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. Moneys 8deposited into the Drug Traffic Prevention Fund pursuant to 9subsection (e) of Section 5-9-1.1 and subsection (c) of 10Section 5-9-1.1-5 of the Unified Code of Corrections shall be 11appropriated to and administered by the Illinois State Police 12for funding of drug task forces and Metropolitan Enforcement 13Groups in accordance with the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 14Enforcement Act. The Drug Traffic Prevention Fund is dissolved 15upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Drug 16Traffic Prevention Fund to the State Police Operations 17Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (i) of Section 186z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 19January 1, 2027. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-595)22    Sec. 2605-595. State Police Firearm Services Fund.23    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 24known as the State Police Firearm Services Fund. The Fund   SB2002 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1shall receive revenue under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, 2the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, Article 24 of 3the Criminal Code of 2012, other provisions of law concerning 4firearm offenses, and Section 5 of the Firearm Owners 5Identification Card Act. The Fund may also receive revenue 6from grants, pass-through grants, donations, appropriations, 7and any other legal source.8    (a-5) (Blank). 9    (a-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 10contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 11provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 13practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 14Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 15Police Firearm Enforcement Fund into the State Police Firearm 16Services Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the State 17Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is dissolved, and any future 18deposits due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 19liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police 20Firearm Services Fund.21    (a-15) The Illinois State Police may use moneys from the 22Fund to establish task forces and, if necessary, include other 23law enforcement agencies, under intergovernmental contracts 24written and executed in conformity with the Intergovernmental 25Cooperation Act.26    (a-20) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the   SB2002 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Fund to hire and train Illinois State Police officers and for 2the prevention of violent crime. 3    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 4finance any of its lawful purposes, mandates, functions, 5enforcement, and duties under the Firearm Owners 6Identification Card Act, the Firearm Dealer License 7Certification Act, Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 8provisions of law concerning firearm offenses, and the Firearm 9Concealed Carry Act, including the cost of sending notices of 10expiration of Firearm Owner's Identification Cards, concealed 11carry licenses, the prompt and efficient processing of 12applications under the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 13and the Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the improved efficiency 14and reporting of the LEADS and federal NICS law enforcement 15data systems, and support for investigations required under 16these Acts and law. Any surplus funds beyond what is needed to 17comply with the aforementioned purposes shall be used by the 18Illinois State Police to improve the Law Enforcement Agencies 19Data System (LEADS) and criminal history background check 20system. 21    (b-5) Any surplus in the Fund beyond what is necessary to 22ensure compliance with subsections (a) through (b) or moneys 23that are specifically appropriated for those purposes shall be 24used by the Illinois State Police to award grants to assist 25with the data reporting requirements of the Gun Trafficking 26Information Act.   SB2002 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (c) Investment income that is attributable to the 2investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 3for the uses specified in this Section. 4(Source: P.A. 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 5103-363, eff. 7-28-23.) 6    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-605)7    Sec. 2605-605. Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force. The 8Director of the Illinois State Police shall establish a 9statewide multi-jurisdictional Violent Crime Intelligence Task 10Force led by the Illinois State Police dedicated to combating 11gun violence, gun-trafficking, and other violent crime with 12the primary mission of preservation of life and reducing the 13occurrence and the fear of crime. The objectives of the Task 14Force shall include, but not be limited to, reducing and 15preventing illegal possession and use of firearms, 16firearm-related homicides, and other violent crimes, and 17solving firearm-related crimes. 18    (1) The Task Force may develop and acquire information, 19training, tools, and resources necessary to implement a 20data-driven approach to policing, with an emphasis on 21intelligence development.22    (2) The Task Force may utilize information sharing, 23partnerships, crime analysis, and evidence-based practices to 24assist in the reduction of firearm-related shootings, 25homicides, and gun-trafficking, including, but not limited to,   SB2002 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1ballistic data, eTrace data, DNA evidence, latent 2fingerprints, firearm training data, and National Integrated 3Ballistic Information Network (NIBIN) data. The Task Force may 4design a model crime gun intelligence strategy which may 5include, but is not limited to, comprehensive collection and 6documentation of all ballistic evidence, timely transfer of 7NIBIN and eTrace leads to an intelligence center, which may 8include the Division of Criminal Investigation of the Illinois 9State Police, timely dissemination of intelligence to 10investigators, investigative follow-up, and coordinated 11prosecution.12    (3) The Task Force may recognize and utilize best 13practices of community policing and may develop potential 14partnerships with faith-based and community organizations to 15achieve its goals.16    (4) The Task Force may identify and utilize best practices 17in drug-diversion programs and other community-based services 18to redirect low-level offenders.19    (5) The Task Force may assist in violence suppression 20strategies including, but not limited to, details in 21identified locations that have shown to be the most prone to 22gun violence and violent crime, focused deterrence against 23violent gangs and groups considered responsible for the 24violence in communities, and other intelligence driven methods 25deemed necessary to interrupt cycles of violence or prevent 26retaliation.  SB2002 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (6) In consultation with the Chief Procurement Officer, 2the Illinois State Police may obtain contracts for software, 3commodities, resources, and equipment to assist the Task Force 4with achieving this Act. Any contracts necessary to support 5the delivery of necessary software, commodities, resources, 6and equipment are not subject to the Illinois Procurement 7Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and 8Article 50 of that Code, provided that the Chief Procurement 9Officer may, in writing with justification, waive any 10certification required under Article 50 of the Illinois 11Procurement Code.12    (7) The Task Force shall conduct enforcement operations 13against persons whose Firearm Owner's Identification Cards 14have been revoked or suspended and persons who fail to comply 15with the requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 16Identification Card Act, prioritizing individuals presenting a 17clear and present danger to themselves or to others under 18paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 8.1 of the Firearm 19Owners Identification Card Act.20    (8) The Task Force shall collaborate with local law 21enforcement agencies to enforce provisions of the Firearm 22Owners Identification Card Act, the Firearm Concealed Carry 23Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, and Article 2424 of the Criminal Code of 2012.25    (9) To implement this Section, the Director of the 26Illinois State Police may establish intergovernmental   SB2002 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1agreements with law enforcement agencies in accordance with 2the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.3    (10) Law enforcement agencies that participate in 4activities described in paragraphs (7) through (9) may apply 5to the Illinois State Police for grants from the State Police 6Firearm Services Fund State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund. 7(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 10Sections 5.99, 5.456, 5.462, 5.530, 5.771, 5.905, 5.920, 115.963, 6z-82, 6z-106, 6z-127, and 8.37 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.99)  (from Ch. 127, par. 141.99)13    Sec. 5.99. The Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. This Fund is 14dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 15Drug Traffic Prevention Fund to the State Police Operations 16Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (i) of Section 176z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 18January 1, 2027. 19(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 20    (30 ILCS 105/5.456)21    Sec. 5.456. The LEADS Maintenance Fund. This Fund is 22dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 23LEADS Maintenance Fund to the State Police Law Enforcement   SB2002 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Administration Fund as provided under subsection (a-5) of 2Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. This Section is 3repealed on January 1, 2027. 4(Source: P.A. 90-130, eff. 1-1-98; 90-655, eff. 7-30-98.) 5    (30 ILCS 105/5.462)6    Sec. 5.462. The Offender Registration Fund. This Fund is 7dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the 8Offender Registration Fund to the State Police Operations 9Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (k) of Section 106z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 11January 1, 2027. 12(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19.) 13    (30 ILCS 105/5.530)14    Sec. 5.530. The State Police Wireless Service Emergency 15Fund. This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 16remaining balance from the State Police Wireless Service 17Emergency Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 18as provided under subsection (j) of Section 6z-82 of the State 19Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 20(Source: P.A. 91-660, eff. 12-22-99; 92-16, eff. 6-28-01.) 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.771)22    Sec. 5.771. The Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund. This 23Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance   SB2002 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1from the Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund to the State 2Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund as provided under 3subsection (b) of Section 6z-106 of the State Finance Act. 4This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 5(Source: P.A. 96-1234, eff. 7-23-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.905)7    Sec. 5.905. The Scott's Law Fund. This Fund is dissolved 8upon the transfer of the remaining balance from the Scott's 9Law Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund as 10provided under subsection (m) of Section 6z-82 of the State 11Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 12(Source: P.A. 101-173, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 13    (30 ILCS 105/5.920)14    Sec. 5.920. The State Police Whistleblower Reward and 15Protection Fund. This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of 16the remaining balance from the State Police Whistleblower 17Reward and Protection Fund to the State Police Operations 18Assistance Fund as provided under subsection (l) of Section 196z-82 of the State Finance Act. This Section is repealed on 20January 1, 2027. 21(Source: P.A. 101-148, eff. 7-26-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 22    (30 ILCS 105/5.963)23    Sec. 5.963. The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.   SB2002 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining 2balance from the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund to the 3State Police Firearm Services Fund as provided under 4subsection (a-10) of Section 2605-595 of the Illinois State 5Police Law. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 6(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-82)9    Sec. 6z-82. State Police Operations Assistance Fund.10    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 11known as the State Police Operations Assistance Fund. The Fund 12shall receive revenue under the Criminal and Traffic 13Assessment Act and Section 8 of the Illinois False Claims Act. 14The Fund may also receive revenue from grants, donations, 15appropriations, and any other legal source.16    (a-5) This Fund may charge, collect, and receive fees or 17moneys as described in Section 15-312 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code and receive all fees received by the Illinois State 19Police under that Section. The moneys shall be used by the 20Illinois State Police for its expenses in providing police 21escorts and commercial vehicle enforcement activities. 22    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 23finance any of its lawful purposes or functions.24    (c) Expenditures may be made from the Fund only as 25appropriated by the General Assembly by law.  SB2002 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (d) Investment income that is attributable to the 2investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 3for the uses specified in this Section. 4    (e) The State Police Operations Assistance Fund shall not 5be subject to administrative chargebacks. 6    (e-5) Moneys in the Fund shall be used to cover costs 7incurred by the criminal justice system to administer the Sex 8Offender Registration and the Murderer and Violent Offender 9Against Youth Registration Act. Fifty percent of the moneys 10received from Sections 3 and 10 of the Sex Offender 11Registration Act and Sections 10 and 60 of the Murder and 12Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act shall be 13allocated by the Illinois State Police for sheriffs' offices 14and police departments. 15    (e-10) Moneys in the Fund shall be used to produce 16materials to educate drivers on approaching stationary 17authorized emergency vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois State 18Police personnel for enforcement of Section 11-907 of the 19Illinois Vehicle Code, and for other law enforcement purposes 20the Director of the Illinois State Police deems necessary in 21these efforts. 22    (f) (Blank).23    (g) (Blank). 24    (h) (Blank). June 9, 2023 (Public Act 103-34)25    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 26contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be   SB2002 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 2of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 3practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 4Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the Drug 5Traffic Prevention Fund into the State Police Operations 6Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Drug 7Traffic Prevention Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits 8due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 9liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police 10Operations Assistance Fund.11    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 13provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 15practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 16Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 17Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund into the State Police 18Operations Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, 19the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund is dissolved, 20and any future deposits due to that Fund and any outstanding 21obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the 22State Police Operations Assistance Fund.23    (k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 24contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 25provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 26of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as   SB2002 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 2Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the 3Offender Registration Fund into the State Police Operations 4Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Offender 5Registration Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits due to 6that Fund and any outstanding obligations or liabilities of 7that Fund shall pass to the State Police Operations Assistance 8Fund.9    (l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 10contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 11provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 13practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 14Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the State 15Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund into the State 16Police Operations Assistance Fund. Upon completion of the 17transfer, the State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection 18Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and 19any outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall 20pass to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund.21    (m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 22contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 23provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 24of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 25practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 26Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the   SB2002 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Scott's Law Fund into the State Police Operations Assistance 2Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the Scott's Law Fund is 3dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and any 4outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass 5to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund. 6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 86-9-23; 103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-616, 9eff. 7-1-24; revised 7-23-24.) 10    (30 ILCS 105/6z-106)11    Sec. 6z-106. State Police Law Enforcement Administration 12Fund.13    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 14known as the State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund. 15The Fund shall receive revenue under subsection (c) of Section 1610-5 of the Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act, and Section 17500-135 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and Section 2605-375 18of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative 19Code of Illinois. The Fund shall also receive the moneys 20designated to be paid into the Fund under subsection (a-5) of 21Section 500-135 of the Illinois Insurance Code and Section 8.6 22of the Illinois Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft 23Prevention and Insurance Verification Act. The Fund may also 24receive revenue from grants, donations, appropriations, and 25any other legal source.  SB2002 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 2contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 3provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 4of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 5practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 6Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the LEADS 7Maintenance Fund into the State Police Law Enforcement 8Administration Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, the 9LEADS Maintenance Fund is dissolved, and any future deposits 10due to that Fund and any outstanding obligations or 11liabilities of that Fund shall pass to the State Police Law 12Enforcement Administration Fund. 13    (a-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 14contrary, and in addition to any other transfers that may be 15provided by law, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 16of the 104th General Assembly, or as soon thereafter as 17practical, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 18Treasurer shall transfer the remaining balance from the Money 19Laundering Asset Recovery Fund into the State Police Law 20Enforcement Administration Fund. Upon completion of the 21transfer, the Money Laundering Asset Recovery Fund is 22dissolved, and any future deposits due to that Fund and any 23outstanding obligations or liabilities of that Fund shall pass 24to the State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund. 25    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 26finance any of its lawful purposes or functions, including,   SB2002 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1but not limited to, training for forensic laboratory personnel 2and other State Police personnel. The Illinois State Police 3may also use moneys for functions in relation to defraying the 4expenses associated with establishing, maintaining, and 5supporting the issuance of electronic citations. However, the 6primary purpose of the Fund shall be to finance State Police 7cadet classes. 8    (c) Expenditures may be made from the Fund only as 9appropriated by the General Assembly by law.10    (d) Investment income that is attributable to the 11investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 12for the uses specified in this Section.13    (e) The State Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund 14shall not be subject to administrative chargebacks.15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 16    (30 ILCS 105/6z-127)17    Sec. 6z-127. State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.18    (a) The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is 19established as a special fund in the State treasury. This Fund 20is established to receive moneys from the Firearm Owners 21Identification Card Act to enforce that Act, the Firearm 22Concealed Carry Act, Article 24 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 23and other firearm offenses. The Fund may also receive revenue 24from grants, donations, appropriations, and any other legal 25source.  SB2002 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys from the Fund 2to establish task forces and, if necessary, include other law 3enforcement agencies, under intergovernmental contracts 4written and executed in conformity with the Intergovernmental 5Cooperation Act.6    (c) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 7hire and train State Police officers and for the prevention of 8violent crime.9    (d) The State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund is not 10subject to administrative chargebacks.11    (e) Law enforcement agencies that participate in Firearm 12Owner's Identification Card revocation enforcement in the 13Violent Crime Intelligence Task Force may apply for grants 14from the Illinois State Police.15    (f) Any surplus in the Fund beyond what is necessary to 16ensure compliance with subsections (a) through (e) or moneys 17that are specifically appropriated for those purposes shall be 18used by the Illinois State Police to award grants to assist 19with the data reporting requirements of the Gun Trafficking 20Information Act. 21    (g) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 22remaining balance from the State Police Firearm Enforcement 23Fund to the State Police Firearm Services Fund as provided 24under subsection (a-10) of Section 2605-595 of the Illinois 25State Police Law. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 26(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22;   SB2002 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    (30 ILCS 105/8.37)3    Sec. 8.37. State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund. 4    (a) The State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund is 5created as a special fund in the State Treasury.6    (b) Grants or surcharge funds allocated to the Illinois 7State Police from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund shall be deposited 8into the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund and 9shall be used in accordance with Section 30 of the Emergency 10Telephone System Act.11    (c) On July 1, 1999, the State Comptroller and State 12Treasurer shall transfer $1,300,000 from the General Revenue 13Fund to the State Police Wireless Service Emergency Fund. On 14June 30, 2003 the State Comptroller and State Treasurer shall 15transfer $1,300,000 from the State Police Wireless Service 16Emergency Fund to the General Revenue Fund.17    (d) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 18remaining balance from the State Police Wireless Service 19Emergency Fund to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 20as provided under subsection (j) of Section 6z-82 of the State 21Finance Act. This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 22(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 23    Section 15. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 24amended by changing Section 5 as follows:   SB2002 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (430 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-5)2    Sec. 5. Application and renewal. 3    (a) The Illinois State Police shall either approve or deny 4all applications within 30 days from the date they are 5received, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), and 6every applicant found qualified under Section 8 of this Act by 7the Illinois State Police shall be entitled to a Firearm 8Owner's Identification Card upon the payment of a $10 fee and 9applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall be 10limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 11electronic online payment system. Any applicant who is an 12active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a 13member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 14Reserve Forces of the United States is exempt from the 15application fee. $10 $5 of each fee derived from the issuance 16of a Firearm Owner's Identification Card or renewals thereof 17shall be deposited in the State Police Firearm Services Fund 18and $5 into the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.19    (b) Renewal applications shall be approved or denied 20within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted his 21or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his or 22her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If a renewal 23application has been submitted prior to the expiration date of 24the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the 25Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall remain valid while   SB2002 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1the Illinois State Police processes the application, unless 2the person is subject to or becomes subject to revocation 3under this Act. The cost for a renewal application shall be $10 4and may include applicable processing fees, which shall be 5limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 6electronic online payment system, which shall be deposited 7into the State Police Firearm Services Fund.8    (c) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 9licensee under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act expires during 10the term of the licensee's concealed carry license, the 11Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the license remain 12valid and the licensee does not have to renew his or her 13Firearm Owner's Identification Card during the duration of the 14concealed carry license. Unless the Illinois State Police has 15reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 16card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 17licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card and send a 18renewed Firearm Owner's Identification Card to the licensee.19    (d) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules concerning 20the use of voluntarily submitted fingerprints, as allowed by 21State and federal law. 22(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    Section 20. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 25changing Section 11-907 as follows:   SB2002 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (625 ILCS 5/11-907)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-667 and 3103-711)4    Sec. 11-907. Operation of vehicles and streetcars on 5approach of authorized emergency vehicles.6    (a) Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency 7vehicle making use of audible and visual signals meeting the 8requirements of this Code or a police vehicle properly and 9lawfully making use of an audible or visual signal:10        (1) the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the 11    right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position 12    parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand 13    edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection and 14    shall, if necessary to permit the safe passage of the 15    emergency vehicle, stop and remain in such position until 16    the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, unless 17    otherwise directed by a police officer; and18        (2) the operator of every streetcar shall immediately 19    stop such car clear of any intersection and keep it in such 20    position until the authorized emergency vehicle has 21    passed, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.22    (b) This Section shall not operate to relieve the driver 23of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with 24due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.25    (c) Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency   SB2002 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1vehicle, when the authorized emergency vehicle is giving a 2signal by displaying alternately flashing red, red and white, 3blue, or red and blue lights or amber or yellow warning lights, 4a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall:5        (1) proceeding with due caution, yield the 6    right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not 7    adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if 8    possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, 9    if on a highway having at least 4 lanes with not less than 10    2 lanes proceeding in the same direction as the 11    approaching vehicle; or12        (2) if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe, 13    proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the 14    vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and 15    leaving a safe distance until safely past the stationary 16    emergency vehicles.17    The visual signal specified under this subsection (c) 18given by an authorized emergency vehicle is an indication to 19drivers of approaching vehicles that a hazardous condition is 20present when circumstances are not immediately clear. Drivers 21of vehicles approaching a stationary emergency vehicle in any 22lane shall heed the warning of the signal, reduce the speed of 23the vehicle, proceed with due caution, maintain a safe speed 24for road conditions, be prepared to stop, and leave a safe 25distance until safely passed the stationary emergency vehicle. 26    As used in this subsection (c), "authorized emergency   SB2002 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1vehicle" includes any vehicle authorized by law to be equipped 2with oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights under Section 312-215 of this Code, while the owner or operator of the vehicle 4is engaged in his or her official duties.5    (d) A person who violates subsection (c) of this Section 6commits a business offense punishable by a fine of not less 7than $250 or more than $10,000 for a first violation, and a 8fine of not less than $750 or more than $10,000 for a second or 9subsequent violation. It is a factor in aggravation if the 10person committed the offense while in violation of Section 1111-501, 12-610.1, or 12-610.2 of this Code. Imposition of the 12penalties authorized by this subsection (d) for a violation of 13subsection (c) of this Section that results in the death of 14another person does not preclude imposition of appropriate 15additional civil or criminal penalties. A person who violates 16subsection (c) and the violation results in damage to another 17vehicle commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person who violates 18subsection (c) and the violation results in the injury or 19death of another person commits a Class 4 felony.20    (e) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 21results in damage to the property of another person, in 22addition to any other penalty imposed, the person's driving 23privileges shall be suspended for a fixed period of not less 24than 90 days and not more than one year.25    (f) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 26results in injury to another person, in addition to any other   SB2002 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall be 2suspended for a fixed period of not less than 180 days and not 3more than 2 years.4    (g) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 5results in the death of another person, in addition to any 6other penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall 7be suspended for 2 years.8    (h) The Secretary of State shall, upon receiving a record 9of a judgment entered against a person under subsection (c) of 10this Section:11        (1) suspend the person's driving privileges for the 12    mandatory period; or13        (2) extend the period of an existing suspension by the 14    appropriate mandatory period.15    (i) The Scott's Law Fund shall be a special fund in the 16State treasury. Subject to appropriation by the General 17Assembly and approval by the Director, the Director of the 18Illinois State Police shall use all moneys in the State Police 19Operations Assistance Fund Scott's Law Fund in the 20Department's discretion to fund the production of materials to 21educate drivers on approaching stationary authorized emergency 22vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois Department of State Police 23personnel for enforcement of this Section, and for other law 24enforcement purposes the Director deems necessary in these 25efforts.26    (j) For violations of this Section issued by a county or   SB2002 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1municipal police officer, the assessment shall be deposited 2into the county's or municipality's Transportation Safety 3Highway Hire-back Fund. The county shall use the moneys in its 4Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 5county police officers to monitor construction or maintenance 6zones in that county on highways other than interstate 7highways. The county, in its discretion, may also use a 8portion of the moneys in its Transportation Safety Highway 9Hire-back Fund to purchase equipment for county law 10enforcement and fund the production of materials to educate 11drivers on construction zone safe driving habits and 12approaching stationary authorized emergency vehicles. 13    (k) In addition to other penalties imposed by this 14Section, the court may order a person convicted of a violation 15of subsection (c) to perform community service as determined 16by the court. 17(Source: P.A. 101-173, eff. 1-1-20; 102-336, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-338, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-667 and 20103-711)21    Sec. 11-907. Operation of vehicles and streetcars on 22approach of authorized emergency vehicles.23    (a) Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency 24vehicle making use of audible and visual signals meeting the 25requirements of this Code or a police vehicle properly and   SB2002 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1lawfully making use of an audible or visual signal:2        (1) the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the 3    right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position 4    parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand 5    edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection and 6    shall, if necessary to permit the safe passage of the 7    emergency vehicle, stop and remain in such position until 8    the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, unless 9    otherwise directed by a police officer; and10        (2) the operator of every streetcar shall immediately 11    stop such car clear of any intersection and keep it in such 12    position until the authorized emergency vehicle has 13    passed, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.14    (b) This Section shall not operate to relieve the driver 15of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with 16due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.17    (c) Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency 18vehicle or emergency scene, when the stationary authorized 19emergency vehicle is giving a visual signal by displaying 20oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights as authorized under 21Section 12-215 of this Code, a person who drives an 22approaching vehicle shall:23        (1) proceeding with due caution, yield the 24    right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not 25    adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if 26    possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions,   SB2002 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    if on a highway having at least 4 lanes with not less than 2    2 lanes proceeding in the same direction as the 3    approaching vehicle and reduce the speed of the vehicle to 4    a speed that is reasonable and proper with regard to 5    traffic conditions and the use of the highway to avoid a 6    collision and leaving a safe distance until safely past 7    the stationary emergency vehicle; or8        (2) if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe, 9    proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the 10    vehicle to a speed that is reasonable and proper with 11    regard to traffic conditions and the use of the highway to 12    avoid a collision, maintaining a safe speed for road 13    conditions and leaving a safe distance until safely past 14    the stationary emergency vehicles.15    The visual signal specified under this subsection (c) 16given by a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is an 17indication to drivers of approaching vehicles that a hazardous 18condition is present when circumstances are not immediately 19clear. Drivers of vehicles approaching a stationary authorized 20emergency vehicle in any lane shall heed the warning of the 21signal, reduce the speed of the vehicle, proceed with due 22caution, maintain a safe speed for road conditions, be 23prepared to stop, and leave a safe distance until safely 24passed the stationary emergency vehicle. 25    As used in this subsection (c), "authorized emergency 26vehicle" includes any vehicle authorized by law to be equipped   SB2002 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1with oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights under Section 212-215 of this Code, while the owner or operator of the vehicle 3is engaged in his or her official duties. As used in this 4subsection (c), "emergency scene" means a location where a 5stationary authorized emergency vehicle as defined by herein 6is present and has activated its oscillating, rotating, or 7flashing lights. 8    (d) A person who violates subsection (c) of this Section 9commits a business offense punishable by a fine of not less 10than $250 or more than $10,000 for a first violation, and a 11fine of not less than $750 or more than $10,000 for a second or 12subsequent violation. It is a factor in aggravation if the 13person committed the offense while in violation of Section 1411-501, 12-610.1, or 12-610.2 of this Code. Imposition of the 15penalties authorized by this subsection (d) for a violation of 16subsection (c) of this Section that results in the death of 17another person does not preclude imposition of appropriate 18additional civil or criminal penalties. A person who violates 19subsection (c) and the violation results in damage to another 20vehicle commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person who violates 21subsection (c) and the violation results in the injury or 22death of another person commits a Class 4 felony.23    (e) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 24results in damage to the property of another person, in 25addition to any other penalty imposed, the person's driving 26privileges shall be suspended for a fixed period of not less   SB2002 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1than 90 days and not more than one year.2    (f) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 3results in injury to another person, in addition to any other 4penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall be 5suspended for a fixed period of not less than 180 days and not 6more than 2 years.7    (g) If a violation of subsection (c) of this Section 8results in the death of another person, in addition to any 9other penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges shall 10be suspended for 2 years.11    (h) The Secretary of State shall, upon receiving a record 12of a judgment entered against a person under subsection (c) of 13this Section:14        (1) suspend the person's driving privileges for the 15    mandatory period; or16        (2) extend the period of an existing suspension by the 17    appropriate mandatory period.18    (i) The Scott's Law Fund shall be a special fund in the 19State treasury. Subject to appropriation by the General 20Assembly and approval by the Director, the Director of the 21Illinois State Police shall use all moneys in the State Police 22Operations Assistance Fund Scott's Law Fund in the 23Department's discretion to fund the production of materials to 24educate drivers on approaching stationary authorized emergency 25vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois State Police personnel for 26enforcement of this Section, and for other law enforcement   SB2002 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1purposes the Director deems necessary in these efforts.2    (j) For violations of this Section issued by a county or 3municipal police officer, the assessment shall be deposited 4into the county's or municipality's Transportation Safety 5Highway Hire-back Fund. The county shall use the moneys in its 6Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 7county police officers to monitor construction or maintenance 8zones in that county on highways other than interstate 9highways. The county, in its discretion, may also use a 10portion of the moneys in its Transportation Safety Highway 11Hire-back Fund to purchase equipment for county law 12enforcement and fund the production of materials to educate 13drivers on construction zone safe driving habits and 14approaching stationary authorized emergency vehicles. 15    (k) In addition to other penalties imposed by this 16Section, the court may order a person convicted of a violation 17of subsection (c) to perform community service as determined 18by the court. 19(Source: P.A. 102-336, eff. 1-1-22; 102-338, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-667, eff. 1-1-25; 103-711, eff. 211-1-25; revised 8-15-24.) 22    Section 25. The Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act is 23amended by changing Section 15-70 as follows: 24    (705 ILCS 135/15-70)  SB2002 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-730)2    Sec. 15-70. Conditional assessments. In addition to 3payments under one of the Schedule of Assessments 1 through 13 4of this Act, the court shall also order payment of any of the 5following conditional assessment amounts for each sentenced 6violation in the case to which a conditional assessment is 7applicable, which shall be collected and remitted by the Clerk 8of the Circuit Court as provided in this Section:9        (1) arson, residential arson, or aggravated arson, 10    $500 per conviction to the State Treasurer for deposit 11    into the Fire Prevention Fund;12        (2) child pornography under Section 11-20.1 of the 13    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, $500 14    per conviction, unless more than one agency is responsible 15    for the arrest in which case the amount shall be remitted 16    to each unit of government equally:17            (A) if the arresting agency is an agency of a unit 18        of local government, $500 to the treasurer of the unit 19        of local government for deposit into the unit of local 20        government's General Fund, except that if the Illinois 21        State Police provides digital or electronic forensic 22        examination assistance, or both, to the arresting 23        agency then $100 to the State Treasurer for deposit 24        into the State Crime Laboratory Fund; or25            (B) if the arresting agency is the Illinois State 26        Police, $500 to the State Treasurer for deposit into   SB2002 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        the State Crime Laboratory Fund;2        (3) crime laboratory drug analysis for a drug-related 3    offense involving possession or delivery of cannabis or 4    possession or delivery of a controlled substance as 5    defined in the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois 6    Controlled Substances Act, or the Methamphetamine Control 7    and Community Protection Act, $100 reimbursement for 8    laboratory analysis, as set forth in subsection (f) of 9    Section 5-9-1.4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;10        (4) DNA analysis, $250 on each conviction in which it 11    was used to the State Treasurer for deposit into the State 12    Crime Laboratory Fund as set forth in Section 5-9-1.4 of 13    the Unified Code of Corrections;14        (5) DUI analysis, $150 on each sentenced violation in 15    which it was used as set forth in subsection (f) of Section 16    5-9-1.9 of the Unified Code of Corrections;17        (6) drug-related offense involving possession or 18    delivery of cannabis or possession or delivery of a 19    controlled substance, other than methamphetamine, as 20    defined in the Cannabis Control Act or the Illinois 21    Controlled Substances Act, an amount not less than the 22    full street value of the cannabis or controlled substance 23    seized for each conviction to be disbursed as follows:24            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 25        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 26        used by the Department of Human Services for the   SB2002 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 2        treatment, and prevention and education services;3            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was 4        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 5        Fund;6            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 7        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 8        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 9        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 10        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;11            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 12        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 13        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 14        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 15        involved in the arrest;16        (6.5) Kane County or Will County, in felony, 17    misdemeanor, local or county ordinance, traffic, or 18    conservation cases, up to $30 as set by the county board 19    under Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties Code upon the entry 20    of a judgment of conviction, an order of supervision, or a 21    sentence of probation without entry of judgment under 22    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 23    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 24    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 25    Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of 26    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012,   SB2002 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Section 10-102 of the Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug 2    Dependency Act, or Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act; 3    except in local or county ordinance, traffic, and 4    conservation cases, if fines are paid in full without a 5    court appearance, then the assessment shall not be imposed 6    or collected. Distribution of assessments collected under 7    this paragraph (6.5) shall be as provided in Section 8    5-1101.3 of the Counties Code;9        (7) methamphetamine-related offense involving 10    possession or delivery of methamphetamine or any salt of 11    an optical isomer of methamphetamine or possession of a 12    methamphetamine manufacturing material as set forth in 13    Section 10 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 14    Protection Act with the intent to manufacture a substance 15    containing methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer of 16    methamphetamine, an amount not less than the full street 17    value of the methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer 18    of methamphetamine or methamphetamine manufacturing 19    materials seized for each conviction to be disbursed as 20    follows:21            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 22        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 23        used by the Department of Human Services for the 24        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 25        treatment, and prevention and education services;26            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was   SB2002 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 2        Fund;3            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 4        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 5        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 6        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 7        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;8            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 9        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 10        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 11        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 12        involved in the arrest;13        (8) order of protection violation under Section 12-3.4 14    of the Criminal Code of 2012, $200 for each conviction to 15    the county treasurer for deposit into the Probation and 16    Court Services Fund for implementation of a domestic 17    violence surveillance program and any other assessments or 18    fees imposed under Section 5-9-1.16 of the Unified Code of 19    Corrections;20        (9) order of protection violation, $25 for each 21    violation to the State Treasurer, for deposit into the 22    Domestic Violence Abuser Services Fund;23        (10) prosecution by the State's Attorney of a:24            (A) petty or business offense, $4 to the county 25        treasurer of which $2 deposited into the State's 26        Attorney Records Automation Fund and $2 into the   SB2002 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        Public Defender Records Automation Fund;2            (B) conservation or traffic offense, $2 to the 3        county treasurer for deposit into the State's Attorney 4        Records Automation Fund;5        (11) speeding in a construction zone violation, $250 6    to the State Treasurer for deposit into the Transportation 7    Safety Highway Hire-back Fund, unless (i) the violation 8    occurred on a highway other than an interstate highway and 9    (ii) a county police officer wrote the ticket for the 10    violation, in which case to the county treasurer for 11    deposit into that county's Transportation Safety Highway 12    Hire-back Fund;13        (12) supervision disposition on an offense under the 14    Illinois Vehicle Code or similar provision of a local 15    ordinance, 50 cents, unless waived by the court, into the 16    Prisoner Review Board Vehicle and Equipment Fund;17        (13) victim and offender are family or household 18    members as defined in Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic 19    Violence Act of 1986 and offender pleads guilty or no 20    contest to or is convicted of murder, voluntary 21    manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, burglary, 22    residential burglary, criminal trespass to residence, 23    criminal trespass to vehicle, criminal trespass to land, 24    criminal damage to property, telephone harassment, 25    kidnapping, aggravated kidnaping, unlawful restraint, 26    forcible detention, child abduction, indecent solicitation   SB2002 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    of a child, sexual relations between siblings, 2    exploitation of a child, child pornography, assault, 3    aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, heinous 4    battery, aggravated battery of a child, domestic battery, 5    reckless conduct, intimidation, criminal sexual assault, 6    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 7    criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual abuse, aggravated 8    criminal sexual abuse, violation of an order of 9    protection, disorderly conduct, endangering the life or 10    health of a child, child abandonment, contributing to 11    dependency or neglect of child, or cruelty to children and 12    others, $200 for each sentenced violation to the State 13    Treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) for sexual assault, 14    as defined in Section 5-9-1.7 of the Unified Code of 15    Corrections, when the offender and victim are family 16    members, one-half to the Domestic Violence Shelter and 17    Service Fund, and one-half to the Sexual Assault Services 18    Fund; (ii) for the remaining offenses to the Domestic 19    Violence Shelter and Service Fund;20        (14) violation of Section 11-501 of the Illinois 21    Vehicle Code, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile Registration 22    and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and 23    Safety Act, or a similar provision, whose operation of a 24    motor vehicle, snowmobile, or watercraft while in 25    violation of Section 11-501, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile 26    Registration and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat   SB2002 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Registration and Safety Act, or a similar provision 2    proximately caused an incident resulting in an appropriate 3    emergency response, $1,000 maximum to the public agency 4    that provided an emergency response related to the 5    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of 6    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 7    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 8    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 9    unit of government equally;10        (15) violation of Section 401, 407, or 407.2 of the 11    Illinois Controlled Substances Act that proximately caused 12    any incident resulting in an appropriate drug-related 13    emergency response, $1,000 as reimbursement for the 14    emergency response to the law enforcement agency that made 15    the arrest, or as provided in subsection (c) of Section 16    10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, unless 17    more than one agency was responsible for the arrest, in 18    which case the amount shall be remitted to each unit of 19    government equally;20        (16) violation of reckless driving, aggravated 21    reckless driving, or driving 26 miles per hour or more in 22    excess of the speed limit that triggered an emergency 23    response, $1,000 maximum reimbursement for the emergency 24    response to be distributed in its entirety to a public 25    agency that provided an emergency response related to the 26    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of   SB2002 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 2    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 3    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 4    unit of government equally;5        (17) violation based upon each plea of guilty, 6    stipulation of facts, or finding of guilt resulting in a 7    judgment of conviction or order of supervision for an 8    offense under Section 10-9, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, or 11-18 of 9    the Criminal Code of 2012 that results in the imposition 10    of a fine, to be distributed as follows: 11            (A) $50 to the county treasurer for deposit into 12        the Circuit Court Clerk Operation and Administrative 13        Fund to cover the costs in administering this 14        paragraph (17); 15            (B) $300 to the State Treasurer who shall deposit 16        the portion as follows: 17                (i) if the arresting or investigating agency 18            is the Illinois State Police, into the State 19            Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund; 20                (ii) if the arresting or investigating agency 21            is the Department of Natural Resources, into the 22            Conservation Police Operations Assistance Fund; 23                (iii) if the arresting or investigating agency 24            is the Secretary of State, into the Secretary of 25            State Police Services Fund; 26                (iv) if the arresting or investigating agency   SB2002 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1            is the Illinois Commerce Commission, into the 2            Transportation Regulatory Fund; or 3                (v) if more than one of the State agencies in 4            this subparagraph (B) is the arresting or 5            investigating agency, then equal shares with the 6            shares deposited as provided in the applicable 7            items (i) through (iv) of this subparagraph (B); 8            and9            (C) the remainder for deposit into the Specialized 10        Services for Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund; 11        (18) weapons violation under Section 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 12    or 24-1.5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 13    of 2012, $100 for each conviction to the State Treasurer 14    for deposit into the Trauma Center Fund; and15        (19) violation of subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of 16    the Illinois Vehicle Code, $250 to the State Treasurer for 17    deposit into the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 18    Scott's Law Fund, unless a county or municipal police 19    officer wrote the ticket for the violation, in which case 20    to the county treasurer for deposit into that county's or 21    municipality's Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back 22    Fund to be used as provided in subsection (j) of Section 23    11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.24    Except for traffic violations, fines and assessments, such 25as fees or administrative costs authorized in this Section, 26shall not be ordered or imposed on a minor subject to Article   SB2002 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1III, IV, or V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or a minor 2under the age of 18 transferred to adult court or excluded from 3juvenile court jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile 4Court Act of 1987, or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal 5custodian. 6(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-379, eff. 87-28-23.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-730)10    Sec. 15-70. Conditional assessments. In addition to 11payments under one of the Schedule of Assessments 1 through 13 12of this Act, the court shall also order payment of any of the 13following conditional assessment amounts for each sentenced 14violation in the case to which a conditional assessment is 15applicable, which shall be collected and remitted by the Clerk 16of the Circuit Court as provided in this Section:17        (1) arson, residential arson, or aggravated arson, 18    $500 per conviction to the State Treasurer for deposit 19    into the Fire Prevention Fund;20        (2) child pornography under Section 11-20.1 of the 21    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, $500 22    per conviction, unless more than one agency is responsible 23    for the arrest in which case the amount shall be remitted 24    to each unit of government equally:25            (A) if the arresting agency is an agency of a unit   SB2002 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        of local government, $500 to the treasurer of the unit 2        of local government for deposit into the unit of local 3        government's General Fund, except that if the Illinois 4        State Police provides digital or electronic forensic 5        examination assistance, or both, to the arresting 6        agency then $100 to the State Treasurer for deposit 7        into the State Crime Laboratory Fund; or8            (B) if the arresting agency is the Illinois State 9        Police, $500 to the State Treasurer for deposit into 10        the State Crime Laboratory Fund;11        (3) crime laboratory drug analysis for a drug-related 12    offense involving possession or delivery of cannabis or 13    possession or delivery of a controlled substance as 14    defined in the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois 15    Controlled Substances Act, or the Methamphetamine Control 16    and Community Protection Act, $100 reimbursement for 17    laboratory analysis, as set forth in subsection (f) of 18    Section 5-9-1.4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;19        (4) DNA analysis, $250 on each conviction in which it 20    was used to the State Treasurer for deposit into the State 21    Crime Laboratory Fund as set forth in Section 5-9-1.4 of 22    the Unified Code of Corrections;23        (5) DUI analysis, $150 on each sentenced violation in 24    which it was used as set forth in subsection (f) of Section 25    5-9-1.9 of the Unified Code of Corrections;26        (6) drug-related offense involving possession or   SB2002 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    delivery of cannabis or possession or delivery of a 2    controlled substance, other than methamphetamine, as 3    defined in the Cannabis Control Act or the Illinois 4    Controlled Substances Act, an amount not less than the 5    full street value of the cannabis or controlled substance 6    seized for each conviction to be disbursed as follows:7            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 8        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 9        used by the Department of Human Services for the 10        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 11        treatment, and prevention and education services;12            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was 13        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 14        Fund;15            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 16        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 17        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 18        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 19        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;20            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 21        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 22        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 23        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 24        involved in the arrest;25        (6.5) Kane County or Will County, in felony, 26    misdemeanor, local or county ordinance, traffic, or   SB2002 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    conservation cases, up to $30 as set by the county board 2    under Section 5-1101.3 of the Counties Code upon the entry 3    of a judgment of conviction, an order of supervision, or a 4    sentence of probation without entry of judgment under 5    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 6    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the 7    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 8    Section 12-4.3 or paragraph (1) of subsection (b) 9    subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code 10    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the 11    Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, or 12    Section 10 of the Steroid Control Act; except in local or 13    county ordinance, traffic, and conservation cases, if 14    fines are paid in full without a court appearance, then 15    the assessment shall not be imposed or collected. 16    Distribution of assessments collected under this paragraph 17    (6.5) shall be as provided in Section 5-1101.3 of the 18    Counties Code;19        (7) methamphetamine-related offense involving 20    possession or delivery of methamphetamine or any salt of 21    an optical isomer of methamphetamine or possession of a 22    methamphetamine manufacturing material as set forth in 23    Section 10 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 24    Protection Act with the intent to manufacture a substance 25    containing methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer of 26    methamphetamine, an amount not less than the full street   SB2002 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    value of the methamphetamine or salt of an optical isomer 2    of methamphetamine or methamphetamine manufacturing 3    materials seized for each conviction to be disbursed as 4    follows:5            (A) 12.5% of the street value assessment shall be 6        paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, to be 7        used by the Department of Human Services for the 8        funding of programs and services for drug-abuse 9        treatment, and prevention and education services;10            (B) 37.5% to the county in which the charge was 11        prosecuted, to be deposited into the county General 12        Fund;13            (C) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 14        enforcement agency of the municipality or county, or 15        to the State Treasurer if the arresting agency was a 16        state agency, to be deposited as provided in 17        subsection (c) of Section 10-5;18            (D) if the arrest was made in combination with 19        multiple law enforcement agencies, the clerk shall 20        equitably allocate the portion in subparagraph (C) of 21        this paragraph (6) among the law enforcement agencies 22        involved in the arrest;23        (8) order of protection violation under Section 12-3.4 24    of the Criminal Code of 2012, $200 for each conviction to 25    the county treasurer for deposit into the Probation and 26    Court Services Fund for implementation of a domestic   SB2002 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    violence surveillance program and any other assessments or 2    fees imposed under Section 5-9-1.16 of the Unified Code of 3    Corrections;4        (9) order of protection violation, $25 for each 5    violation to the State Treasurer, for deposit into the 6    Domestic Violence Abuser Services Fund;7        (10) prosecution by the State's Attorney of a:8            (A) petty or business offense, $4 to the county 9        treasurer of which $2 deposited into the State's 10        Attorney Records Automation Fund and $2 into the 11        Public Defender Records Automation Fund;12            (B) conservation or traffic offense, $2 to the 13        county treasurer for deposit into the State's Attorney 14        Records Automation Fund;15        (11) speeding in a construction zone violation, $250 16    to the State Treasurer for deposit into the Transportation 17    Safety Highway Hire-back Fund, unless (i) the violation 18    occurred on a highway other than an interstate highway and 19    (ii) a county police officer wrote the ticket for the 20    violation, in which case to the county treasurer for 21    deposit into that county's Transportation Safety Highway 22    Hire-back Fund;23        (12) supervision disposition on an offense under the 24    Illinois Vehicle Code or similar provision of a local 25    ordinance, 50 cents, unless waived by the court, into the 26    Prisoner Review Board Vehicle and Equipment Fund;  SB2002 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        (13) victim and offender are family or household 2    members as defined in Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic 3    Violence Act of 1986 and offender pleads guilty or no 4    contest to or is convicted of murder, voluntary 5    manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, burglary, 6    residential burglary, criminal trespass to residence, 7    criminal trespass to vehicle, criminal trespass to land, 8    criminal damage to property, telephone harassment, 9    kidnapping, aggravated kidnaping, unlawful restraint, 10    forcible detention, child abduction, indecent solicitation 11    of a child, sexual relations between siblings, 12    exploitation of a child, child pornography, assault, 13    aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, heinous 14    battery, aggravated battery of a child, domestic battery, 15    reckless conduct, intimidation, criminal sexual assault, 16    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 17    criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual abuse, aggravated 18    criminal sexual abuse, violation of an order of 19    protection, disorderly conduct, endangering the life or 20    health of a child, child abandonment, contributing to 21    dependency or neglect of child, or cruelty to children and 22    others, $200 for each sentenced violation to the State 23    Treasurer for deposit as follows: (i) for sexual assault, 24    as defined in Section 5-9-1.7 of the Unified Code of 25    Corrections, when the offender and victim are family 26    members, one-half to the Domestic Violence Shelter and   SB2002 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Service Fund, and one-half to the Sexual Assault Services 2    Fund; (ii) for the remaining offenses to the Domestic 3    Violence Shelter and Service Fund;4        (14) violation of Section 11-501 of the Illinois 5    Vehicle Code, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile Registration 6    and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and 7    Safety Act, or a similar provision, whose operation of a 8    motor vehicle, snowmobile, or watercraft while in 9    violation of Section 11-501, Section 5-7 of the Snowmobile 10    Registration and Safety Act, Section 5-16 of the Boat 11    Registration and Safety Act, or a similar provision 12    proximately caused an incident resulting in an appropriate 13    emergency response, $1,000 maximum to the public agency 14    that provided an emergency response related to the 15    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of 16    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 17    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 18    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 19    unit of government equally;20        (15) violation of Section 401, 407, or 407.2 of the 21    Illinois Controlled Substances Act that proximately caused 22    any incident resulting in an appropriate drug-related 23    emergency response, $1,000 as reimbursement for the 24    emergency response to the law enforcement agency that made 25    the arrest, or as provided in subsection (c) of Section 26    10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, unless   SB2002 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    more than one agency was responsible for the arrest, in 2    which case the amount shall be remitted to each unit of 3    government equally;4        (16) violation of reckless driving, aggravated 5    reckless driving, or driving 26 miles per hour or more in 6    excess of the speed limit that triggered an emergency 7    response, $1,000 maximum reimbursement for the emergency 8    response to be distributed in its entirety to a public 9    agency that provided an emergency response related to the 10    person's violation, or as provided in subsection (c) of 11    Section 10-5 if the arresting agency was a State agency, 12    unless more than one agency was responsible for the 13    arrest, in which case the amount shall be remitted to each 14    unit of government equally;15        (17) violation based upon each plea of guilty, 16    stipulation of facts, or finding of guilt resulting in a 17    judgment of conviction or order of supervision for an 18    offense under Section 10-9, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, or 11-18 of 19    the Criminal Code of 2012 that results in the imposition 20    of a fine, to be distributed as follows: 21            (A) $50 to the county treasurer for deposit into 22        the Circuit Court Clerk Operation and Administrative 23        Fund to cover the costs in administering this 24        paragraph (17); 25            (B) $300 to the State Treasurer who shall deposit 26        the portion as follows:   SB2002 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1                (i) if the arresting or investigating agency 2            is the Illinois State Police, into the State 3            Police Law Enforcement Administration Fund; 4                (ii) if the arresting or investigating agency 5            is the Department of Natural Resources, into the 6            Conservation Police Operations Assistance Fund; 7                (iii) if the arresting or investigating agency 8            is the Secretary of State, into the Secretary of 9            State Police Services Fund; 10                (iv) if the arresting or investigating agency 11            is the Illinois Commerce Commission, into the 12            Transportation Regulatory Fund; or 13                (v) if more than one of the State agencies in 14            this subparagraph (B) is the arresting or 15            investigating agency, then equal shares with the 16            shares deposited as provided in the applicable 17            items (i) through (iv) of this subparagraph (B); 18            and19            (C) the remainder for deposit into the Specialized 20        Services for Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund; 21        (18) weapons violation under Section 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 22    or 24-1.5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 23    of 2012, $100 for each conviction to the State Treasurer 24    for deposit into the Trauma Center Fund; and25        (19) violation of subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of 26    the Illinois Vehicle Code, $250 to the State Treasurer for   SB2002 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    deposit into the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 2    Scott's Law Fund, unless a county or municipal police 3    officer wrote the ticket for the violation, in which case 4    to the county treasurer for deposit into that county's or 5    municipality's Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back 6    Fund to be used as provided in subsection (j) of Section 7    11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and .8        (20) violation of Section 15-109.1 of the Illinois 9    Vehicle Code, $150 to be distributed as follows:10            (A) 50% to the county treasurer for deposit into 11        the county general fund; and12            (B) 50% to the treasurer of the arresting law 13        enforcement agency of the municipality or county or to 14        the State Treasurer, if the arresting agency was a 15        State agency, to be deposited as provided in 16        subsection (c) of Section 10-5.17    Except for traffic violations, fines, and assessments, 18such as fees or administrative costs authorized in this 19Section, shall not be ordered or imposed on a minor subject to 20Article III, IV, or V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or a 21minor under the age of 18 transferred to adult court or 22excluded from juvenile court jurisdiction under Article V of 23the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the minor's parent, 24guardian, or legal custodian. 25(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-379, eff.   SB2002 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b17-28-23; 103-730, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-21-24.) 2    Section 30. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 3changing Section 29B-26 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 5/29B-26)5    Sec. 29B-26. Distribution of proceeds. All moneys and the 6sale proceeds of all other property forfeited and seized under 7this Article shall be distributed as follows:8        (1) 65% shall be distributed to the metropolitan 9    enforcement group, local, municipal, county, or State law 10    enforcement agency or agencies that conducted or 11    participated in the investigation resulting in the 12    forfeiture. The distribution shall bear a reasonable 13    relationship to the degree of direct participation of the 14    law enforcement agency in the effort resulting in the 15    forfeiture, taking into account the total value of the 16    property forfeited and the total law enforcement effort 17    with respect to the violation of the law upon which the 18    forfeiture is based. Amounts distributed to the agency or 19    agencies shall be used for the enforcement of laws. 20        (2)(i) 12.5% shall be distributed to the Office of the 21    State's Attorney of the county in which the prosecution 22    resulting in the forfeiture was instituted, deposited in a 23    special fund in the county treasury and appropriated to 24    the State's Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws.   SB2002 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    In counties over 3,000,000 population, 25% shall be 2    distributed to the Office of the State's Attorney for use 3    in the enforcement of laws. If the prosecution is 4    undertaken solely by the Attorney General, the portion 5    provided under this subparagraph (i) shall be distributed 6    to the Attorney General for use in the enforcement of 7    laws. 8        (ii) 12.5% shall be distributed to the Office of the 9    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and deposited in 10    the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund of that office to be 11    used for additional expenses incurred in the 12    investigation, prosecution, and appeal of cases arising 13    under laws. The Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 14    Prosecutor shall not receive distribution from cases 15    brought in counties with over 3,000,000 population. 16        (3) 10% shall be retained by the Illinois State Police 17    for expenses related to the administration and sale of 18    seized and forfeited property. 19    Moneys and the sale proceeds distributed to the Illinois 20State Police under this Article shall be deposited into in the 21State Police Law Enforcement Administration Money Laundering 22Asset Recovery Fund created in the State treasury and shall be 23used by the Illinois State Police for State law enforcement 24purposes. All moneys and sale proceeds of property forfeited 25and seized under this Article and distributed according to 26this Section may also be used to purchase opioid antagonists   SB2002 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1as defined in Section 5-23 of the Substance Use Disorder Act. 2(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 3    Section 35. The Cannabis Control Act is amended by 4changing Sections 8 and 10.2 as follows: 5    (720 ILCS 550/8)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 708)6    Sec. 8. Except as otherwise provided in the Cannabis 7Regulation and Tax Act and the Industrial Hemp Act, it is 8unlawful for any person knowingly to produce the Cannabis 9sativa plant or to possess such plants unless production or 10possession has been authorized pursuant to the provisions of 11Section 11 or 15.2 of the Act. Any person who violates this 12Section with respect to production or possession of:13        (a) Not more than 5 plants is guilty of a civil 14    violation punishable by a minimum fine of $100 and a 15    maximum fine of $200. The proceeds of the fine are payable 16    to the clerk of the circuit court. Within 30 days after the 17    deposit of the fine, the clerk shall distribute the 18    proceeds of the fine as follows:19            (1) $10 of the fine to the circuit clerk and $10 of 20        the fine to the law enforcement agency that issued the 21        citation; the proceeds of each $10 fine distributed to 22        the circuit clerk and each $10 fine distributed to the 23        law enforcement agency that issued the citation for 24        the violation shall be used to defer the cost of   SB2002 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        automatic expungements under paragraph (2.5) of 2        subsection (a) of Section 5.2 of the Criminal 3        Identification Act;4            (2) $15 to the county to fund drug addiction 5        services;6            (3) $10 to the Office of the State's Attorneys 7        Appellate Prosecutor for use in training programs;8            (4) $10 to the State's Attorney; and9            (5) any remainder of the fine to the law 10        enforcement agency that issued the citation for the 11        violation.12        With respect to funds designated for the Illinois 13    State Police, the moneys shall be remitted by the circuit 14    court clerk to the State Treasurer within one month after 15    receipt for deposit into the State Police Operations 16    Assistance Fund. With respect to funds designated for the 17    Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Natural 18    Resources shall deposit the moneys into the Conservation 19    Police Operations Assistance Fund.20        (b) More than 5, but not more than 20 plants, is guilty 21    of a Class 4 felony.22        (c) More than 20, but not more than 50 plants, is 23    guilty of a Class 3 felony.24        (d) More than 50, but not more than 200 plants, is 25    guilty of a Class 2 felony for which a fine not to exceed 26    $100,000 may be imposed and for which liability for the   SB2002 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    cost of conducting the investigation and eradicating such 2    plants may be assessed. Compensation for expenses incurred 3    in the enforcement of this provision shall be transmitted 4    to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the level of 5    government represented by the Illinois law enforcement 6    agency whose officers or employees conducted the 7    investigation or caused the arrest or arrests leading to 8    the prosecution, to be subsequently made available to that 9    law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use in 10    the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 11    and cannabis. If such seizure was made by a combination of 12    law enforcement personnel representing different levels of 13    government, the court levying the assessment shall 14    determine the allocation of such assessment. The proceeds 15    of assessment awarded to the State treasury shall be 16    deposited in a special fund known as the State Police 17    Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund.18        (e) More than 200 plants is guilty of a Class 1 felony 19    for which a fine not to exceed $100,000 may be imposed and 20    for which liability for the cost of conducting the 21    investigation and eradicating such plants may be assessed. 22    Compensation for expenses incurred in the enforcement of 23    this provision shall be transmitted to and deposited in 24    the treasurer's office at the level of government 25    represented by the Illinois law enforcement agency whose 26    officers or employees conducted the investigation or   SB2002 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    caused the arrest or arrests leading to the prosecution, 2    to be subsequently made available to that law enforcement 3    agency as expendable receipts for use in the enforcement 4    of laws regulating controlled substances and cannabis. If 5    such seizure was made by a combination of law enforcement 6    personnel representing different levels of government, the 7    court levying the assessment shall determine the 8    allocation of such assessment. The proceeds of assessment 9    awarded to the State treasury shall be deposited in a 10    special fund known as the State Police Operations 11    Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund. 12(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 13102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 145-13-22.) 15    (720 ILCS 550/10.2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 710.2)16    Sec. 10.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 17collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Act 18shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 19is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 20Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 21services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 22education services, for juveniles.23    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 24all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 25transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the   SB2002 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1level of government as follows: 2        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 3    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 4    local government, the court levying the fine shall 5    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 6    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 7    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 8    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 9    local government from a municipality where the number of 10    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 11    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 12    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 13    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 14    differing units of local government, and at least one of 15    those units represents a municipality where the number of 16    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 17    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 18    fines received among the differing units of local 19    government. 20        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 21    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 22    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 23    fund. 24        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 25    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 26    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court   SB2002 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 2    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 3    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 4    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.5    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 6enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 7government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 8to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 9in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 10and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 11treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 12State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 13Prevention Fund, except that amounts distributed to the 14Secretary of State shall be deposited into the Secretary of 15State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in Section 2-115 of 16the Illinois Vehicle Code. Monies from this fund may be used by 17the Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 18regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 19funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 20Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 21returning violators of this Act, the Illinois Controlled 22Substances Act, and the Methamphetamine Control and Community 23Protection Act only, as provided in such Acts, when punishment 24of the crime shall be confinement of the criminal in the 25penitentiary; and all other monies shall be paid into the 26general revenue fund in the State treasury.  SB2002 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    Section 40. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 3amended by changing Section 413 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 570/413)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1413)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-881)6    Sec. 413. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 7collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Article 8shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 9is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 10Department for the funding of programs and services for 11drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and education services, 12for juveniles.13    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 14all fines received under the provisions of this Article shall 15be transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at 16the level of government as follows:17        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 18    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 19    local government, the court levying the fine shall 20    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 21    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 22    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 23    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 24    local government from a municipality where the number of   SB2002 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 2    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 3    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 4    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 5    differing units of local government, and at least one of 6    those units represents a municipality where the number of 7    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 8    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 9    fines received among the differing units of local 10    government.11        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 12    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 13    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 14    fund.15        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 16    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 17    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 18    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 19    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 20    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 21    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.22    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 23enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 24government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 25to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 26in the enforcement of laws regulating cannabis,   SB2002 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1methamphetamine, and other controlled substances. The proceeds 2of fines awarded to the State treasury shall be deposited in a 3special fund known as the State Police Operations Assistance 4Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund, except that amounts 5distributed to the Secretary of State shall be deposited into 6the Secretary of State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in 7Section 2-115 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Monies from this 8fund may be used by the Illinois State Police or use in the 9enforcement of laws regulating cannabis, methamphetamine, and 10other controlled substances; to satisfy funding provisions of 11the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act; to defray 12costs and expenses associated with returning violators of the 13Cannabis Control Act and this Act only, as provided in those 14Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement of the 15criminal in the penitentiary; and all other monies shall be 16paid into the general revenue fund in the State treasury.17(Source: P.A. 97-334, eff. 1-1-12.) 18    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-881)19    Sec. 413. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 20collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Article 21shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 22is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 23Department for the funding of programs and services for 24substance use disorder treatment, and prevention and education 25services, for juveniles.  SB2002 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 2all fines received under the provisions of this Article shall 3be transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at 4the level of government as follows:5        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 6    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 7    local government, the court levying the fine shall 8    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 9    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 10    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 11    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 12    local government from a municipality where the number of 13    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 14    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 15    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 16    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 17    differing units of local government, and at least one of 18    those units represents a municipality where the number of 19    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 20    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 21    fines received among the differing units of local 22    government.23        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 24    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 25    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 26    fund.  SB2002 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 2    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 3    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 4    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 5    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 6    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 7    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.8    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 9enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 10government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 11to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 12in the enforcement of laws regulating cannabis, 13methamphetamine, and other controlled substances. The proceeds 14of fines awarded to the State treasury shall be deposited in a 15special fund known as the State Police Operations Assistance 16Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund, except that amounts 17distributed to the Secretary of State shall be deposited into 18the Secretary of State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in 19Section 2-115 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Monies from this 20fund may be used by the Illinois State Police or use in the 21enforcement of laws regulating cannabis, methamphetamine, and 22other controlled substances; to satisfy funding provisions of 23the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act; to defray 24costs and expenses associated with returning violators of the 25Cannabis Control Act and this Act only, as provided in those 26Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement of the   SB2002 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1criminal in the penitentiary; and all other monies shall be 2paid into the general revenue fund in the State treasury.3(Source: P.A. 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    Section 45. The Methamphetamine Control and Community 5Protection Act is amended by changing Section 95 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 646/95)7    Sec. 95. Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund. 8    (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts collected 9as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Article shall be 10paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund created by the 11Controlled Substances Act in the State treasury, to be used by 12the Department for the funding of programs and services for 13drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and education services, 14for juveniles. 15    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 16all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 17transmitted to and deposited into the State treasury and 18distributed as follows: 19        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 20    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 21    local government, the court levying the fine shall 22    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 23    local government and shall allocate 37.5% to the county 24    general corporate fund. If the seizure was made by law   SB2002 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    enforcement personnel representing a unit of local 2    government from a municipality where the number of 3    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 4    levying the fine shall allocate 87.5% of the fine to that 5    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 6    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 7    differing units of local government and if at least one of 8    those units represents a municipality where the number of 9    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 10    shall equitably allocate 87.5% of the proceeds of the 11    fines received among the differing units of local 12    government. 13        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 14    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37.5% to the 15    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 16    fund. 17        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 18    with any law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 19    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 20    shall equitably allocate 37.5% of the fines to or among 21    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 22    units of local government that conducted the seizure and 23    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund. 24    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 25enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 26government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available   SB2002 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 2in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 3and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 4treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 5State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 6Prevention Fund, except that amounts distributed to the 7Secretary of State shall be deposited into the Secretary of 8State Evidence Fund to be used as provided in Section 2-115 of 9the Illinois Vehicle Code. Moneys from this Fund may be used by 10the Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 11regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 12funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 13Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 14returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act and this Act 15only, as provided in those Acts, when punishment of the crime 16shall be confinement of the criminal in the penitentiary; and 17all other moneys shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund in 18the State treasury.19(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 20    Section 50. The Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act is amended 21by changing Sections 5 and 5.2 as follows: 22    (725 ILCS 175/5)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1655)23    Sec. 5. (a) A person who commits the offense of narcotics 24racketeering shall:  SB2002 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        (1) be guilty of a Class 1 felony; and2        (2) be subject to a fine of up to $250,000.3    A person who commits the offense of narcotics racketeering 4or who violates Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control 5Act shall forfeit to the State of Illinois: (A) any profits or 6proceeds and any property or property interest he has acquired 7or maintained in violation of this Act or Section 3 of the Drug 8Paraphernalia Control Act or has used to facilitate a 9violation of this Act that the court determines, after a 10forfeiture hearing, under subsection (b) of this Section to 11have been acquired or maintained as a result of narcotics 12racketeering or violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia 13Control Act, or used to facilitate narcotics racketeering; and 14(B) any interest in, security of, claim against, or property 15or contractual right of any kind affording a source of 16influence over, any enterprise which he has established, 17operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the 18conduct of, in violation of this Act or Section 3 of the Drug 19Paraphernalia Control Act, that the court determines, after a 20forfeiture hearing, under subsection (b) of this Section to 21have been acquired or maintained as a result of narcotics 22racketeering or violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia 23Control Act or used to facilitate narcotics racketeering.24    (b) The court shall, upon petition by the Attorney General 25or State's Attorney, at any time subsequent to the filing of an 26information or return of an indictment, conduct a hearing to   SB2002 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1determine whether any property or property interest is subject 2to forfeiture under this Act. At the forfeiture hearing the 3people shall have the burden of establishing, by a 4preponderance of the evidence, that property or property 5interests are subject to forfeiture under this Act. There is a 6rebuttable presumption at such hearing that any property or 7property interest of a person charged by information or 8indictment with narcotics racketeering or who is convicted of 9a violation of Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act 10is subject to forfeiture under this Section if the State 11establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that:12        (1) such property or property interest was acquired by 13    such person during the period of the violation of this Act 14    or Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act or 15    within a reasonable time after such period; and16        (2) there was no likely source for such property or 17    property interest other than the violation of this Act or 18    Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act.19    (c) In an action brought by the People of the State of 20Illinois under this Act, wherein any restraining order, 21injunction or prohibition or any other action in connection 22with any property or property interest subject to forfeiture 23under this Act is sought, the circuit court which shall 24preside over the trial of the person or persons charged with 25narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 of this Act or 26violating Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act   SB2002 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1shall first determine whether there is probable cause to 2believe that the person or persons so charged has committed 3the offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 4of this Act or a violation of Section 3 of the Drug 5Paraphernalia Control Act and whether the property or property 6interest is subject to forfeiture pursuant to this Act.7    In order to make such a determination, prior to entering 8any such order, the court shall conduct a hearing without a 9jury, wherein the People shall establish that there is: (i) 10probable cause that the person or persons so charged have 11committed the offense of narcotics racketeering or violating 12Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act and (ii) 13probable cause that any property or property interest may be 14subject to forfeiture pursuant to this Act. Such hearing may 15be conducted simultaneously with a preliminary hearing, if the 16prosecution is commenced by information or complaint, or by 17motion of the People, at any stage in the proceedings. The 18court may accept a finding of probable cause at a preliminary 19hearing following the filing of an information charging the 20offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in Section 4 of 21this Act or the return of an indictment by a grand jury 22charging the offense of narcotics racketeering as defined in 23Section 4 of this Act or after a charge is filed for violating 24Section 3 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act as sufficient 25evidence of probable cause as provided in item (i) above.26    Upon such a finding, the circuit court shall enter such   SB2002 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1restraining order, injunction or prohibition, or shall take 2such other action in connection with any such property or 3property interest subject to forfeiture under this Act, as is 4necessary to insure that such property is not removed from the 5jurisdiction of the court, concealed, destroyed or otherwise 6disposed of by the owner of that property or property interest 7prior to a forfeiture hearing under subsection (b) of this 8Section. The Attorney General or State's Attorney shall file a 9certified copy of such restraining order, injunction or other 10prohibition with the recorder of deeds or registrar of titles 11of each county where any such property of the defendant may be 12located. No such injunction, restraining order or other 13prohibition shall affect the rights of any bona fide 14purchaser, mortgagee, judgment creditor or other lien holder 15arising prior to the date of such filing.16    The court may, at any time, upon verified petition by the 17defendant, conduct a hearing to release all or portions of any 18such property or interest which the court previously 19determined to be subject to forfeiture or subject to any 20restraining order, injunction, or prohibition or other action. 21The court may release such property to the defendant for good 22cause shown and within the sound discretion of the court.23    (d) Prosecution under this Act may be commenced by the 24Attorney General or a State's Attorney.25    (e) Upon an order of forfeiture being entered pursuant to 26subsection (b) of this Section, the court shall authorize the   SB2002 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Attorney General to seize any property or property interest 2declared forfeited under this Act and under such terms and 3conditions as the court shall deem proper. Any property or 4property interest that has been the subject of an entered 5restraining order, injunction or prohibition or any other 6action filed under subsection (c) shall be forfeited unless 7the claimant can show by a preponderance of the evidence that 8the property or property interest has not been acquired or 9maintained as a result of narcotics racketeering or has not 10been used to facilitate narcotics racketeering.11    (f) The Attorney General or his designee is authorized to 12sell all property forfeited and seized pursuant to this Act, 13unless such property is required by law to be destroyed or is 14harmful to the public, and, after the deduction of all 15requisite expenses of administration and sale, shall 16distribute the proceeds of such sale, along with any moneys 17forfeited or seized, in accordance with subsection (g) or (h), 18whichever is applicable.19    (g) All monies and the sale proceeds of all other property 20forfeited and seized pursuant to this Act shall be distributed 21as follows:22        (1) An amount equal to 50% shall be distributed to the 23    unit of local government whose officers or employees 24    conducted the investigation into narcotics racketeering 25    and caused the arrest or arrests and prosecution leading 26    to the forfeiture. Amounts distributed to units of local   SB2002 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    government shall be used for enforcement of laws governing 2    narcotics activity or for public education in the 3    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 4    abuse of drugs or alcohol. In the event, however, that the 5    investigation, arrest or arrests and prosecution leading 6    to the forfeiture were undertaken solely by a State 7    agency, the portion provided hereunder shall be paid into 8    the State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 9    Prevention Fund in the State treasury to be used for 10    enforcement of laws governing narcotics activity.11        (2) An amount equal to 12.5% shall be distributed to 12    the county in which the prosecution resulting in the 13    forfeiture was instituted, deposited in a special fund in 14    the county treasury and appropriated to the State's 15    Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws governing 16    narcotics activity or for public education in the 17    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 18    abuse of drugs or alcohol.19        An amount equal to 12.5% shall be distributed to the 20    Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and 21    deposited in the Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Fund, which 22    is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 23    Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor for 24    additional expenses incurred in prosecuting appeals 25    arising under this Act. Any amounts remaining in the Fund 26    after all additional expenses have been paid shall be used   SB2002 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    by the Office to reduce the participating county 2    contributions to the Office on a pro-rated basis as 3    determined by the board of governors of the Office of the 4    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor based on the 5    populations of the participating counties.6        (3) An amount equal to 25% shall be paid into the State 7    Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention 8    Fund in the State treasury to be used by the Illinois State 9    Police for funding Metropolitan Enforcement Groups created 10    pursuant to the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement 11    Act. Any amounts remaining in the Fund after full funding 12    of Metropolitan Enforcement Groups shall be used for 13    enforcement, by the State or any unit of local government, 14    of laws governing narcotics activity or for public 15    education in the community or schools in the prevention or 16    detection of the abuse of drugs or alcohol.17    (h) Where the investigation or indictment for the offense 18of narcotics racketeering or a violation of Section 3 of the 19Drug Paraphernalia Control Act has occurred under the 20provisions of the Statewide Grand Jury Act, all monies and the 21sale proceeds of all other property shall be distributed as 22follows:23        (1) 60% shall be distributed to the metropolitan 24    enforcement group, local, municipal, county, or State law 25    enforcement agency or agencies which conducted or 26    participated in the investigation resulting in the   SB2002 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    forfeiture. The distribution shall bear a reasonable 2    relationship to the degree of direct participation of the 3    law enforcement agency in the effort resulting in the 4    forfeiture, taking into account the total value of the 5    property forfeited and the total law enforcement effort 6    with respect to the violation of the law on which the 7    forfeiture is based. Amounts distributed to the agency or 8    agencies shall be used for the enforcement of laws 9    governing cannabis and controlled substances or for public 10    education in the community or schools in the prevention or 11    detection of the abuse of drugs or alcohol.12        (2) 25% shall be distributed by the Attorney General 13    as grants to drug education, treatment and prevention 14    programs licensed or approved by the Department of Human 15    Services. In making these grants, the Attorney General 16    shall take into account the plans and service priorities 17    of, and the needs identified by, the Department of Human 18    Services.19        (3) 15% shall be distributed to the Attorney General 20    and the State's Attorney, if any, participating in the 21    prosecution resulting in the forfeiture. The distribution 22    shall bear a reasonable relationship to the degree of 23    direct participation in the prosecution of the offense, 24    taking into account the total value of the property 25    forfeited and the total amount of time spent in preparing 26    and presenting the case, the complexity of the case and   SB2002 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    other similar factors. Amounts distributed to the Attorney 2    General under this paragraph shall be retained in a fund 3    held by the State Treasurer as ex-officio custodian to be 4    designated as the Statewide Grand Jury Prosecution Fund 5    and paid out upon the direction of the Attorney General 6    for expenses incurred in criminal prosecutions arising 7    under the Statewide Grand Jury Act. Amounts distributed to 8    a State's Attorney shall be deposited in a special fund in 9    the county treasury and appropriated to the State's 10    Attorney for use in the enforcement of laws governing 11    narcotics activity or for public education in the 12    community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 13    abuse of drugs or alcohol.14    (i) All monies deposited pursuant to this Act in the State 15Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund 16established under Section 5-9-1.2 of the Unified Code of 17Corrections are appropriated, on a continuing basis, to the 18Illinois State Police to be used for funding Metropolitan 19Enforcement Groups created pursuant to the Intergovernmental 20Drug Laws Enforcement Act or otherwise for the enforcement of 21laws governing narcotics activity or for public education in 22the community or schools in the prevention or detection of the 23abuse of drugs or alcohol.24(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 25    (725 ILCS 175/5.2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1655.2)  SB2002 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Sec. 5.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all amounts 2collected as fines pursuant to the provisions of this Act 3shall be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which 4is hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 5Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 6services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 7education services, for juveniles.8    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 9all fines received under the provisions of this Act shall be 10transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the 11level of government as follows: 12        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 13    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 14    local government, the court levying the fine shall 15    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 16    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 17    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 18    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 19    local government from a municipality where the number of 20    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 21    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 22    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 23    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 24    differing units of local government, and at least one of 25    those units represents a municipality where the number of 26    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court   SB2002 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 2    fines received among the differing units of local 3    government. 4        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 5    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 6    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 7    fund. 8        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 9    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 10    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 11    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 12    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 13    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 14    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.15    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 16enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 17government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 18to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 19in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 20and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 21treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 22State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 23Prevention Fund. Monies from this fund may be used by the 24Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 25regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 26funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws   SB2002 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1Enforcement Act; to defray costs and expenses associated with 2returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act and the 3Illinois Controlled Substances Act only, as provided in those 4Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement of the 5criminal in the penitentiary; and all other monies shall be 6paid into the general revenue fund in the State treasury.7(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 55. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 9changing Section 5-9-1.2 as follows: 10    (730 ILCS 5/5-9-1.2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-9-1.2)11    Sec. 5-9-1.2. (a) Twelve and one-half percent of all 12amounts collected as fines pursuant to Section 5-9-1.1 shall 13be paid into the Youth Drug Abuse Prevention Fund, which is 14hereby created in the State treasury, to be used by the 15Department of Human Services for the funding of programs and 16services for drug-abuse treatment, and prevention and 17education services, for juveniles.18    (b) Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds of 19all fines received pursuant to Section 5-9-1.1 shall be 20transmitted to and deposited in the treasurer's office at the 21level of government as follows: 22        (1) If such seizure was made by a combination of law 23    enforcement personnel representing differing units of 24    local government, the court levying the fine shall   SB2002 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    equitably allocate 50% of the fine among these units of 2    local government and shall allocate 37 1/2% to the county 3    general corporate fund. In the event that the seizure was 4    made by law enforcement personnel representing a unit of 5    local government from a municipality where the number of 6    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 7    levying the fine shall allocate 87 1/2% of the fine to that 8    unit of local government. If the seizure was made by a 9    combination of law enforcement personnel representing 10    differing units of local government, and at least one of 11    those units represents a municipality where the number of 12    inhabitants exceeds 2 million in population, the court 13    shall equitably allocate 87 1/2% of the proceeds of the 14    fines received among the differing units of local 15    government. 16        (2) If such seizure was made by State law enforcement 17    personnel, then the court shall allocate 37 1/2% to the 18    State treasury and 50% to the county general corporate 19    fund. 20        (3) If a State law enforcement agency in combination 21    with a law enforcement agency or agencies of a unit or 22    units of local government conducted the seizure, the court 23    shall equitably allocate 37 1/2% of the fines to or among 24    the law enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or 25    units of local government which conducted the seizure and 26    shall allocate 50% to the county general corporate fund.  SB2002 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (c) The proceeds of all fines allocated to the law 2enforcement agency or agencies of the unit or units of local 3government pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made available 4to that law enforcement agency as expendable receipts for use 5in the enforcement of laws regulating controlled substances 6and cannabis. The proceeds of fines awarded to the State 7treasury shall be deposited in a special fund known as the 8State Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic 9Prevention Fund. Monies from this fund may be used by the 10Illinois State Police for use in the enforcement of laws 11regulating controlled substances and cannabis; to satisfy 12funding provisions of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws 13Enforcement Act; and to defray costs and expenses associated 14with returning violators of the Cannabis Control Act, the 15Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the Methamphetamine 16Control and Community Protection Act only, as provided in 17those Acts, when punishment of the crime shall be confinement 18of the criminal in the penitentiary. Moneys in the State 19Police Operations Assistance Fund Drug Traffic Prevention Fund 20deposited from fines awarded as a direct result of enforcement 21efforts of the Illinois Conservation Police may be used by the 22Department of Natural Resources Office of Law Enforcement for 23use in enforcing laws regulating controlled substances and 24cannabis on Department of Natural Resources regulated lands 25and waterways. All other monies shall be paid into the general 26revenue fund in the State treasury.  SB2002 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (d) There is created in the State treasury the 2Methamphetamine Law Enforcement Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall 3be equitably allocated to local law enforcement agencies to: 4(1) reimburse those agencies for the costs of securing and 5cleaning up sites and facilities used for the illegal 6manufacture of methamphetamine; (2) defray the costs of 7employing full-time or part-time peace officers from a 8Metropolitan Enforcement Group or other local drug task force, 9including overtime costs for those officers; and (3) defray 10the costs associated with medical or dental expenses incurred 11by the county resulting from the incarceration of 12methamphetamine addicts in the county jail or County 13Department of Corrections. 14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 15    Section 60. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended 16by changing Sections 3, 10, and 11 as follows: 17    (730 ILCS 150/3)18    Sec. 3. Duty to register. 19    (a) A sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, or 20sexual predator shall, within the time period prescribed in 21subsections (b) and (c), register in person and provide 22accurate information as required by the Illinois State Police. 23Such information shall include a current photograph, current 24address, current place of employment, the sex offender's or   SB2002 Enrolled- 87 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1sexual predator's telephone number, including cellular 2telephone number, the employer's telephone number, school 3attended, all e-mail addresses, instant messaging identities, 4chat room identities, and other Internet communications 5identities that the sex offender uses or plans to use, all 6Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) registered or used by the sex 7offender, all blogs and other Internet sites maintained by the 8sex offender or to which the sex offender has uploaded any 9content or posted any messages or information, extensions of 10the time period for registering as provided in this Article 11and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the extension 12was granted and the date the sex offender was notified of the 13extension. The information shall also include a copy of the 14terms and conditions of parole or release signed by the sex 15offender and given to the sex offender by his or her 16supervising officer or aftercare specialist, the county of 17conviction, license plate numbers for every vehicle registered 18in the name of the sex offender, the age of the sex offender at 19the time of the commission of the offense, the age of the 20victim at the time of the commission of the offense, and any 21distinguishing marks located on the body of the sex offender. 22A sex offender convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 2311-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 24Criminal Code of 2012 shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) 25addresses in his or her residence, registered in his or her 26name, accessible at his or her place of employment, or   SB2002 Enrolled- 88 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1otherwise under his or her control or custody. If the sex 2offender is a child sex offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 3or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 42012, the sex offender shall report to the registering agency 5whether he or she is living in a household with a child under 618 years of age who is not his or her own child, provided that 7his or her own child is not the victim of the sex offense. The 8sex offender or sexual predator shall register: 9        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 10    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 11    period of time of 3 or more days, unless the municipality 12    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 13    register at a fixed location designated by the 14    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 15        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 16    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 17    of 3 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 18    incorporated, no police chief exists. 19    If the sex offender or sexual predator is employed at or 20attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 21also register: 22        (i) with: 23            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 24        which he or she is employed at or attends an 25        institution of higher education, unless the 26        municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he   SB2002 Enrolled- 89 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        or she shall register at a fixed location designated 2        by the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 3        Department; or4            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she is 5        employed or attends an institution of higher education 6        located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, 7        no police chief exists; and 8        (ii) with the public safety or security director of 9    the institution of higher education which he or she is 10    employed at or attends. 11    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 12or county of primary registration, and not to campus 13registration. 14    For purposes of this Article, the place of residence or 15temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 16sex offender resides for an aggregate period of time of 3 or 17more days during any calendar year. Any person required to 18register under this Article who lacks a fixed address or 19temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 20jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 3 days 21after ceasing to have a fixed residence.22    A sex offender or sexual predator who is temporarily 23absent from his or her current address of registration for 3 or 24more days shall notify the law enforcement agency having 25jurisdiction of his or her current registration, including the 26itinerary for travel, in the manner provided in Section 6 of   SB2002 Enrolled- 90 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1this Act for notification to the law enforcement agency having 2jurisdiction of change of address. 3    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 4in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 5or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 6of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 7The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly 8registration to include all the locations where the person has 9stayed during the past 7 days. 10    The sex offender or sexual predator shall provide accurate 11information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 12information shall include the sex offender's or sexual 13predator's current place of employment. 14    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 15shall, within 3 days after beginning school or employment in 16this State, register in person and provide accurate 17information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 18information will include current place of employment, school 19attended, and address in state of residence. A sex offender 20convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 2111-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 22shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) addresses in his or 23her residence, registered in his or her name, accessible at 24his or her place of employment, or otherwise under his or her 25control or custody. The out-of-state student or out-of-state 26employee shall register:   SB2002 Enrolled- 91 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        (1) with:2            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 3        which he or she attends school or is employed for a 4        period of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate 5        period of time of more than 30 days during any calendar 6        year, unless the municipality is the City of Chicago, 7        in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 8        location designated by the Superintendent of the 9        Chicago Police Department; or 10            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she 11        attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 12        or more days or for an aggregate period of time of more 13        than 30 days during any calendar year in an 14        unincorporated area or, if incorporated, no police 15        chief exists; and16        (2) with the public safety or security director of the 17    institution of higher education he or she is employed at 18    or attends for a period of time of 5 or more days or for an 19    aggregate period of time of more than 30 days during a 20    calendar year.21    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 22or county of primary registration, and not to campus 23registration.24    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 25provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 26Police. That information shall include the out-of-state   SB2002 Enrolled- 92 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1student's current place of school attendance or the 2out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 3    (a-10) Any law enforcement agency registering sex 4offenders or sexual predators in accordance with subsections 5(a) or (a-5) of this Section shall forward to the Attorney 6General a copy of sex offender registration forms from persons 7convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 811-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 92012, including periodic and annual registrations under 10Section 6 of this Act.11    (b) Any sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, 12or sexual predator, regardless of any initial, prior, or other 13registration, shall, within 3 days of beginning school, or 14establishing a residence, place of employment, or temporary 15domicile in any county, register in person as set forth in 16subsection (a) or (a-5). 17    (c) The registration for any person required to register 18under this Article shall be as follows: 19        (1) Any person registered under the Habitual Child Sex 20    Offender Registration Act or the Child Sex Offender 21    Registration Act prior to January 1, 1996, shall be deemed 22    initially registered as of January 1, 1996; however, this 23    shall not be construed to extend the duration of 24    registration set forth in Section 7. 25        (2) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1) or 26    (c)(4), any person convicted or adjudicated prior to   SB2002 Enrolled- 93 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    January 1, 1996, whose liability for registration under 2    Section 7 has not expired, shall register in person prior 3    to January 31, 1996. 4        (2.1) A sex offender or sexual predator, who has never 5    previously been required to register under this Act, has a 6    duty to register if the person has been convicted of any 7    felony offense after July 1, 2011. A person who previously 8    was required to register under this Act for a period of 10 9    years and successfully completed that registration period 10    has a duty to register if: (i) the person has been 11    convicted of any felony offense after July 1, 2011, and 12    (ii) the offense for which the 10 year registration was 13    served currently requires a registration period of more 14    than 10 years. Notification of an offender's duty to 15    register under this subsection shall be pursuant to 16    Section 5-7 of this Act. 17        (2.5) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 18    person who has not been notified of his or her 19    responsibility to register shall be notified by a criminal 20    justice entity of his or her responsibility to register. 21    Upon notification the person must then register within 3 22    days of notification of his or her requirement to 23    register. Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1), if 24    notification is not made within the offender's 10 year 25    registration requirement, and the Illinois State Police 26    determines no evidence exists or indicates the offender   SB2002 Enrolled- 94 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    attempted to avoid registration, the offender will no 2    longer be required to register under this Act. 3        (3) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 4    person convicted on or after January 1, 1996, shall 5    register in person within 3 days after the entry of the 6    sentencing order based upon his or her conviction. 7        (4) Any person unable to comply with the registration 8    requirements of this Article because he or she is 9    confined, institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on 10    or after January 1, 1996, shall register in person within 11    3 days of discharge, parole or release. 12        (5) The person shall provide positive identification 13    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 14    the registering address. 15        (6) The person shall pay a $100 initial registration 16    fee and a $100 annual renewal fee to the registering law 17    enforcement agency having jurisdiction. The registering 18    agency may waive the registration fee if it determines 19    that the person is indigent and unable to pay the 20    registration fee. Thirty-five dollars for the initial 21    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee shall 22    be retained and used by the registering agency for 23    official purposes. Having retained $35 of the initial 24    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee, the 25    registering agency shall remit the remainder of the fee to 26    State agencies within 30 days of receipt for deposit into   SB2002 Enrolled- 95 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    the State funds as follows:2            (A) Five dollars of the initial registration fee 3        and $5 of the annual fee shall be remitted to the State 4        Treasurer who shall deposit the moneys into the Sex 5        Offender Management Board Fund under Section 19 of the 6        Sex Offender Management Board Act. Money deposited 7        into the Sex Offender Management Board Fund shall be 8        administered by the Sex Offender Management Board and 9        shall be used by the Board to comply with the 10        provisions of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.11            (B) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 12        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 13        the Illinois State Police which shall deposit the 14        moneys into the State Police Operations Assistance 15        Fund Offender Registration Fund. 16            (C) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 17        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 18        the Attorney General who shall deposit the moneys into 19        the Attorney General Sex Offender Awareness, Training, 20        and Education Fund. Moneys deposited into the Fund 21        shall be used by the Attorney General to administer 22        the I-SORT program and to alert and educate the 23        public, victims, and witnesses of their rights under 24        various victim notification laws and for training law 25        enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and medical 26        providers of their legal duties concerning the   SB2002 Enrolled- 96 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1        prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 2        The registering agency shall establish procedures to 3    document the receipt and remittance of the $100 initial 4    registration fee and $100 annual renewal fee. 5    (d) Within 3 days after obtaining or changing employment 6and, if employed on January 1, 2000, within 5 days after that 7date, a person required to register under this Section must 8report, in person to the law enforcement agency having 9jurisdiction, the business name and address where he or she is 10employed. If the person has multiple businesses or work 11locations, every business and work location must be reported 12to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 13(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (730 ILCS 150/10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 230)15    Sec. 10. Penalty. 16    (a) Any person who is required to register under this 17Article who violates any of the provisions of this Article and 18any person who is required to register under this Article who 19seeks to change his or her name under Article XXI of the Code 20of Civil Procedure is guilty of a Class 3 felony, unless, as 21provided under Section 21-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, 22that person verifies under oath that the petition for the name 23change is due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a 24victim of trafficking or gender-related identity as defined by 25the Illinois Human Rights Act. Any person who is convicted for   SB2002 Enrolled- 97 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1a violation of this Act for a second or subsequent time is 2guilty of a Class 2 felony, unless, as provided under Section 321-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that person verifies 4under oath that the petition for the name change is due to 5marriage, religious beliefs, status as a victim of trafficking 6or gender-related identity as defined by the Illinois Human 7Rights Act. Any person who is required to register under this 8Article who knowingly or willfully gives material information 9required by this Article that is false is guilty of a Class 3 10felony. Any person convicted of a violation of any provision 11of this Article shall, in addition to any other penalty 12required by law, be required to serve a minimum period of 7 13days confinement in the local county jail. The court shall 14impose a mandatory minimum fine of $500 for failure to comply 15with any provision of this Article. These fines shall be 16deposited in the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 17Offender Registration Fund. Any sex offender, as defined in 18Section 2 of this Act, or sexual predator who violates any 19provision of this Article may be arrested and tried in any 20Illinois county where the sex offender can be located. The 21local police department or sheriff's office is not required to 22determine whether the person is living within its 23jurisdiction. 24    (b) Any person, not covered by privilege under Part 8 of 25Article VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure or the Illinois 26Supreme Court's Rules of Professional Conduct, who has reason   SB2002 Enrolled- 98 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1to believe that a sexual predator is not complying, or has not 2complied, with the requirements of this Article and who, with 3the intent to assist the sexual predator in eluding a law 4enforcement agency that is seeking to find the sexual predator 5to question the sexual predator about, or to arrest the sexual 6predator for, his or her noncompliance with the requirements 7of this Article is guilty of a Class 3 felony if he or she:8        (1) provides false information to the law enforcement 9    agency having jurisdiction about the sexual predator's 10    noncompliance with the requirements of this Article, and, 11    if known, the whereabouts of the sexual predator;12        (2) harbors, or attempts to harbor, or assists another 13    person in harboring or attempting to harbor, the sexual 14    predator; or15        (3) conceals or attempts to conceal, or assists 16    another person in concealing or attempting to conceal, the 17    sexual predator.18    (c) Subsection (b) does not apply if the sexual predator 19is incarcerated in or is in the custody of a State correctional 20facility, a private correctional facility, a county or 21municipal jail, a State mental health facility or a State 22treatment and detention facility, or a federal correctional 23facility. 24    (d) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply if the sex 25offender accurately registered his or her Internet protocol 26address under this Act, and the address subsequently changed   SB2002 Enrolled- 99 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1without his or her knowledge or intent. 2(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (730 ILCS 150/11)4    Sec. 11. Offender Registration Fund. 5    (a) There is created the Offender Registration Fund 6(formerly known as the Sex Offender Registration Fund). Moneys 7in the Fund shall be used to cover costs incurred by the 8criminal justice system to administer this Article and the 9Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth Registration Act, 10and for purposes as authorized under this Section. The 11Illinois State Police shall establish and promulgate rules and 12procedures regarding the administration of this Fund. Fifty 13percent of the moneys in the Fund shall be allocated by the 14Department for sheriffs' offices and police departments. The 15remaining moneys in the Fund received under Public Act 101-571 16shall be allocated to the Illinois State Police for education 17and administration of the Act. 18    (b) This Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the 19remaining balance from the Offender Registration Fund to the 20State Police Operations Assistance Fund as provided under 21subsection (k) of Section 6z-82 of the State Finance Act. This 22Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 24103-616, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB2002 Enrolled- 100 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Section 65. The Murderer and Violent Offender Against 2Youth Registration Act is amended by changing Sections 10 and 360 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 154/10)5    Sec. 10. Duty to register. 6    (a) A violent offender against youth shall, within the 7time period prescribed in subsections (b) and (c), register in 8person and provide accurate information as required by the 9Illinois State Police. Such information shall include a 10current photograph, current address, current place of 11employment, the employer's telephone number, school attended, 12extensions of the time period for registering as provided in 13this Act and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the 14extension was granted and the date the violent offender 15against youth was notified of the extension. A person who has 16been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act which, if 17committed by an adult, would be a violent offense against 18youth shall register as an adult violent offender against 19youth within 10 days after attaining 17 years of age. The 20violent offender against youth shall register: 21        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 22    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 23    period of time of 5 or more days, unless the municipality 24    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 25    register at a fixed location designated by the   SB2002 Enrolled- 101 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 2        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 3    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 4    of 5 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 5    incorporated, no police chief exists. 6    If the violent offender against youth is employed at or 7attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 8register: 9        (i) with the chief of police in the municipality in 10    which he or she is employed at or attends an institution of 11    higher education, unless the municipality is the City of 12    Chicago, in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 13    location designated by the Superintendent of the Chicago 14    Police Department; or15        (ii) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 16    is employed or attends an institution of higher education 17    located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, no 18    police chief exists. 19    For purposes of this Act, the place of residence or 20temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 21violent offender against youth resides for an aggregate period 22of time of 5 or more days during any calendar year. Any person 23required to register under this Act who lacks a fixed address 24or temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 25jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 5 days 26after ceasing to have a fixed residence.  SB2002 Enrolled- 102 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 2in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 3or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 4of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 5The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly 6registration to include all the locations where the person has 7stayed during the past 7 days. 8    The violent offender against youth shall provide accurate 9information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 10information shall include the current place of employment of 11the violent offender against youth. 12    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 13shall, within 5 days after beginning school or employment in 14this State, register in person and provide accurate 15information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 16information will include current place of employment, school 17attended, and address in state of residence. The out-of-state 18student or out-of-state employee shall register: 19        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 20    which he or she attends school or is employed for a period 21    of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate period of 22    time of more than 30 days during any calendar year, unless 23    the municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 24    or she shall register at a fixed location designated by 25    the Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 26        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she   SB2002 Enrolled- 103 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 or 2    more days or for an aggregate period of time of more than 3    30 days during any calendar year in an unincorporated area 4    or, if incorporated, no police chief exists.5    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 6provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 7Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 8student's current place of school attendance or the 9out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 10    (b) Any violent offender against youth regardless of any 11initial, prior, or other registration, shall, within 5 days of 12beginning school, or establishing a residence, place of 13employment, or temporary domicile in any county, register in 14person as set forth in subsection (a) or (a-5). 15    (c) The registration for any person required to register 16under this Act shall be as follows: 17        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 18    subsection (c), any person who has not been notified of 19    his or her responsibility to register shall be notified by 20    a criminal justice entity of his or her responsibility to 21    register. Upon notification the person must then register 22    within 5 days of notification of his or her requirement to 23    register. If notification is not made within the 24    offender's 10 year registration requirement, and the 25    Illinois State Police determines no evidence exists or 26    indicates the offender attempted to avoid registration,   SB2002 Enrolled- 104 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    the offender will no longer be required to register under 2    this Act. 3        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 4    subsection (c), any person convicted on or after the 5    effective date of this Act shall register in person within 6    5 days after the entry of the sentencing order based upon 7    his or her conviction. 8        (3) Any person unable to comply with the registration 9    requirements of this Act because he or she is confined, 10    institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on or after 11    the effective date of this Act shall register in person 12    within 5 days of discharge, parole or release. 13        (4) The person shall provide positive identification 14    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 15    the registering address. 16        (5) The person shall pay a $20 initial registration 17    fee and a $10 annual renewal fee. The fees shall be 18    deposited into the State Police Operations Assistance Fund 19    Offender Registration Fund. The fees shall be used by the 20    registering agency for official purposes. The agency shall 21    establish procedures to document receipt and use of the 22    funds. The law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may 23    waive the registration fee if it determines that the 24    person is indigent and unable to pay the registration fee. 25    (d) Within 5 days after obtaining or changing employment, 26a person required to register under this Section must report,   SB2002 Enrolled- 105 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1in person to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, 2the business name and address where he or she is employed. If 3the person has multiple businesses or work locations, every 4business and work location must be reported to the law 5enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 6(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    (730 ILCS 154/60)8    Sec. 60. Penalty. Any person who is required to register 9under this Act who violates any of the provisions of this Act 10and any person who is required to register under this Act who 11seeks to change his or her name under Article XXI of the Code 12of Civil Procedure is guilty of a Class 3 felony unless, as 13provided under Section 21-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, 14that person verifies under oath that the petition for the name 15change is due to marriage, religious beliefs, status as a 16victim of trafficking or gender-related identity as defined by 17the Illinois Human Rights Act. Any person who is convicted for 18a violation of this Act for a second or subsequent time is 19guilty of a Class 2 felony unless, as provided under Section 2021-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that person verifies 21under oath that the petition for the name change is due to 22marriage, religious beliefs, status as a victim of trafficking 23or gender-related identity as defined by the Illinois Human 24Rights Act. Any person who is required to register under this 25Act who knowingly or willfully gives material information   SB2002 Enrolled- 106 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1required by this Act that is false is guilty of a Class 3 2felony. Any person convicted of a violation of any provision 3of this Act shall, in addition to any other penalty required by 4law, be required to serve a minimum period of 7 days 5confinement in the local county jail. The court shall impose a 6mandatory minimum fine of $500 for failure to comply with any 7provision of this Act. These fines shall be deposited into the 8State Police Operations Assistance Fund Offender Registration 9Fund. Any violent offender against youth who violates any 10provision of this Act may be arrested and tried in any Illinois 11county where the violent offender against youth can be 12located. The local police department or sheriff's office is 13not required to determine whether the person is living within 14its jurisdiction. 15(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-1133, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 70. The Illinois False Claims Act is amended by 17changing Section 8 as follows: 18    (740 ILCS 175/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4108)19    Sec. 8. Funds; Grants. 20    (a) There is hereby created the State Whistleblower Reward 21and Protection Fund to be held outside of the State Treasury 22with the State Treasurer as custodian. All proceeds of an 23action or settlement of a claim brought under this Act shall be 24deposited in the Fund. Any attorneys' fees, expenses, and   SB2002 Enrolled- 107 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1costs paid by or awarded against any defendant pursuant to 2Section 4 of this Act shall not be considered part of the 3proceeds to be deposited in the Fund. 4    (b) For all cases resolved before October 1, 2023, monies 5in the Fund shall be allocated as follows: One-sixth of the 6monies shall be paid to the Attorney General Whistleblower 7Reward and Protection Fund, which is hereby created as a 8special fund in the State Treasury, and one-sixth of the 9monies shall be paid to the State Police Operations Assistance 10Fund State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund, 11which is hereby created as a special fund in the State 12Treasury, for State law enforcement purposes. The remaining 13two-thirds of the monies in the Fund shall be used for payment 14of awards to Qui Tam plaintiffs and as otherwise specified in 15this Act, with any remainder to the General Revenue Fund. The 16Attorney General shall direct the State Treasurer to make 17disbursement of funds.18    (c) For all cases resolved on or after October 1, 2023, 19monies in the Fund shall be allocated as follows: One-third of 20the monies shall be paid to the Attorney General Whistleblower 21Reward and Protection Fund. The remaining two-thirds of the 22monies in the Fund shall be used for payment of awards to Qui 23Tam plaintiffs and as otherwise specified in this Act, with 24any remainder to the General Revenue Fund. The Attorney 25General shall direct the State Treasurer to make disbursement 26of funds.   SB2002 Enrolled- 108 -LRB104 03188 RTM 13209 b1    (d) The State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection 2Fund is dissolved upon the transfer of the remaining balance 3from the State Police Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund 4to the State Police Operations Assistance Fund as provided 5under subsection (l) of Section 6z-82 of the State Finance 6Act. 7(Source: P.A. 103-145, eff. 10-1-23.) 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 16September 1, 2026.